Tennessee, session 114, HB0015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-126, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The governor is authorized to expand medicaid eligibility solely for the purpose of
providing treatment for a patient with a diagnosis of sickle cell disease in accordance
with the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Pub. L. No. 111-148). The
governor is authorized to negotiate with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid
services with respect to the terms of medicaid expansion for such purpose.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0015
000462
- 1 -